Utah statutes.
59-26-104.   Collection of tax.

A multi-channel video or audio service provider shall:

(1)  collect the tax imposed by Section 59-26-103 from the purchaser;

(2) pay the tax collected under Subsection (1) to the commission:

(a)  monthly on or before the last day of the month immediately following the last day of the previous month if:

(i)  the multi-channel video or audio service provider is required to file a sales and use tax return with the commission monthly under Section 59-12-108; or

(ii)  the multi-channel video or audio service provider is not required to file a sales and use tax return under Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act; or

(b)  quarterly on or before the last day of the month immediately following the last day of the previous quarter if the multi-channel video or audio service provider is required to file a sales and use tax return with the commission quarterly under Section 59-12-108; and

(3)  pay the tax collected under Subsection (1) using a form prescribed by the commission.



Amended by Chapter 309, 2011 General Session

